Utah statutes.
41-1a-507.   Exceptions to title requirements for off-highway vehicles.

(1)  Each off-highway vehicle operated in this state and identified by the manufacturer as a 1988 year model or newer is subject to the titling provisions of this part except:

(a)  off-highway vehicles owned and operated by nonresidents of  the state;

(b)  off-highway vehicles owned and operated by the federal government; and

(c)  off-highway vehicles that are registered for highway use.

(2)  The division may not provide title to an off-highway vehicle identified by the manufacturer as a 1987 year model or older.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

